Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201860-3302
Driverless-capable vehicle; operation; conditions.

A driverless-capable vehicle may operate on the public roads of this state without a conventional human driver physically present in the vehicle, as long as the vehicle meets the following conditions:

(1) The vehicle is capable of achieving a minimal risk condition if a malfunction of the automated driving system occurs that renders the system unable to perform the entire dynamic driving task within its intended operational design domain, if any; and

(2) While in driverless operation, the vehicle is capable of operating in compliance with the applicable traffic and motor vehicle safety laws and regulations of this state that govern the performance of the dynamic driving task, including, but not limited to, safely negotiating railroad crossings, unless an exemption has been granted by the department. The department shall consult with the railroad companies operating in this state when considering an exemption that affects vehicle operations at railroad crossings.

Laws 2018, LB989, § 2.